Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.10, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Basic revenue. (a) The basic revenue for each district equals the formula allowance times the adjusted pupil units for the school year. deleted text begin The formula allowance for fiscal year 2023 is $6,863.deleted text end The formula allowance for fiscal year 2024 is $7,138. The formula allowance for fiscal year 2025 is $7,281. (b) The formula allowance for fiscal year 2026 and later must be rounded to the nearest whole dollar and equals the formula allowance for the previous fiscal year times the greater of: (1) deleted text begin 1.02deleted text end new text begin 1.05new text end ; or (2) one plus the rate of change in inflation calculated in paragraph (c) but not to exceed deleted text begin 1.03deleted text end new text begin 1.06new text end . (c) In January of the calendar year in which the formula allowance begins, the commissioner of education must calculate the rate of change in inflation equal to the change in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the Department of Labor for the average of the fourth calendar quarter of the second prior fiscal year compared to the average of the fourth calendar quarter of the immediately prior fiscal year. (d) The commissioner must publish the formula allowance by the end of February of each year. (e) It is the policy and purpose of the legislature to fund its public schools consistent with its constitutional obligations. To this purpose, the legislature may enact additional increases in the general education basic formula allowance. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GENERAL EDUCATION AID.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin General education aid. new text end new text begin For general education aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.13, subdivision 4: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end